New Jersey, session 221, A295.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Commissioner of Education shall allow a person with a developmental disability who is 21 years of age and older, who, due to behavioral problems, it was determined could not be provided a suitable special education program pursuant to the provisions of N.J.S.18A:46-14, to attend a special educational program approved under N.J.S.18A:46-1 et seq. if: a.     the behavioral problems that led to the determination that a suitable special education program could not be provided to the person have resolved; and b.    the person will benefit from attending the special education program. 2.    a.  Notwithstanding any law or regulation to the contrary, a person with a developmental disability who is 21 years of age and older who transitions from receiving services and supports from the Division of Children's System of Care in the Department of Children and Families to receiving services and supports from the Division of Developmental Disabilities in the Department of Human Services shall be eligible to attend and participate in both an adult day program and an employment program if: (1)   the person meets the eligibility requirements of and applies to both the adult day program and the employment program; and (2)   the persons individualized service plan developed pursuant to N.J.A.C.10:4C-1.1 et seq. contains documentation that the person is authorized to both attend the day program and participate in the employment program. b.    As used in this section: Day program means a program that is certified to provide day habilitation services or sheltered workshops for persons with developmental disabilities; and Employment program means a program designed for persons with developmental disabilities whose disabilities make sheltered employment, after completion of a certified program of vocational evaluation and training, the only suitable form of employment. 3.    This act shall take effect immediately.